Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-146
Effect of person's dissociation as
member.

(RULLCA
603) (a) When a person is dissociated as a member of a limited liability company:

(1) the person's right
to participate as a member in the management and conduct of the company's
activities terminates;

(2)
if the company is member-managed, the person's fiduciary duties as a member
end with regard to matters arising and events occurring after the person's
dissociation; and

(3)
subject to section 21-143 and sections 21-170 to 21-184, any transferable
interest owned by the person immediately before dissociation in the person's
capacity as a member is owned by the person solely as a transferee.

(b) A person's dissociation
as a member of a limited liability company does not of itself discharge the
person from any debt, obligation, or other liability to the company or the
other members which the person incurred while a member.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 46.